North Dakota, session 69, SB2265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LINE OF CREDIT - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA - APPROPRIATION -
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS - DEFICIENCY APPROPRIATION REQUEST -
VETERANS' NATIONAL CEMETERY GRANT - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT. Subject to the
provisions of this section, the department of veterans' affairs may borrow up to $3,000,000 through a
line of credit from the Bank of North Dakota during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027, the proceeds of which are appropriated to the department of veterans' affairs, for the
purpose of providing a grant to a nonprofit organization for construction costs associated with the
construction of a welcome center, parking lot, and related infrastructure at a veterans' national cemetery
in the state, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The appropriation in
this section is considered a one-time funding item. The interest rate on the line of credit may not exceed
the prevailing interest rate charged to North Dakota governmental entities. If the department of
veterans' affairs accesses the line of credit, the department of veterans' affairs shall request a
deficiency appropriation from the legislative assembly to repay the line of credit. The appropriation in
this section is available only upon certification by the department of veterans' affairs to the director of
the office of management and budget that the United States department of veterans affairs national
cemetery administration will provide final approval of the project plan and authorization to begin
construction on the project. The department of veterans' affairs shall require an organization that
receives a grant under this section to provide a report to the department of veterans' affairs on the use
of the funds received, including copies of all invoices and checks. The department of veterans' affairs
shall provide the information received from the organization to the legislative audit and fiscal review
committee and report to the committee on the status of the project during the 2025-26 interim.

S. B. NO. 2265 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2265.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 1 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State